test/src/morphology/N-ava_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - ава: # Ordinary nouns - full paradigm including MWN
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ава
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: авань
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: авань
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: авада
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: авада
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Indef: аванди
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Indef: аванди
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: авафтома
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: авафтома
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Indef: авашка
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Indef: авашка
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Indef: аваса
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Indef: аваса
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Indef: аваста
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Indef: аваста
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: авас
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: авас
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Indef: авава
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Indef: авава
    ава+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: авакс
    ава+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: авакс
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: авазе
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: аване
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: авазень
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: аванень
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [авазенди, авазти]
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: аваненди
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: авадон
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: авадон
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: авафтомон
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: авафтомон
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg1: авашкан
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg1: авашкан
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: авасон
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: авасон
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: авастон
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: авастон
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: авазон
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: авазон
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: ававан
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: ававан
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: аваце
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: аватне
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: авацень
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: аватнень
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: авадот
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: авадот
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: авафтомот
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: авафтомот
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg2: авашкат
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg2: авашкат
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: авасот
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: авасот
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: авастот
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: авастот
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: авазт
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: авазт
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: авават
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: авават
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: авац
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: аванза
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: аванц
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: аванзон
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: авадонза
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: авадонза
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: аванцты
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: аванзонды
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: авафтомонза
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: авафтомонза
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg3: авашканза
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg3: авашканза
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: авасонза
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: авасонза
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: авастонза
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: авастонза
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: авазонза
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: авазонза
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: ававанза
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: ававанза
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: аваньке
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: аваньке
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: аванькень
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: аванькень
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: аванькенди
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: аванькенди
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: авадонк
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: авадонк
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: авафтомонк
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: авафтомонк
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl1: авашканк
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl1: авашканк
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: авасонк
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: авасонк
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: авастонк
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: авастонк
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: авазонк
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: авазонк
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: ававанк
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: ававанк
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: аванте
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: аванте
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: авантень
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: авантень
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: авантенди
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: авантенди
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: авадонт
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: авадонт
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: авафтомонт
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: авафтомонт
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl2: авашкант
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl2: авашкант
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: авасонт
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: авасонт
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: авастонт
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: авастонт
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: авазонт
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: авазонт
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: ававант
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: ававант
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: авасна
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: авасна
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: аваснон
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: аваснон
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: аваснонды
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: аваснонды
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: авадост
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: авадост
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: авафтомост
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: авафтомост
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl3: авашкаст
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl3: авашкаст
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: авасост
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: авасост
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: авастост
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: авастост
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: авазост
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: авазост
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: ававаст
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: ававаст
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ават
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: аване
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: аванза
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Def: авась
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Def: авать
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Def: авати
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Def: аватне
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Def: аватнень
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Def: аватненди
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: ававок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аваньвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аваньвок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авадавок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авадавок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авандивок
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авандивок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомавок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомавок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкавок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкавок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авасавок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авасавок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аваставок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аваставок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авасвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авасвок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авававок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авававок
    ава+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аваксвок
    ава+N+Pl+Tra+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аваксвок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авазевок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: аваневок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авазеньвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: аваненьвок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: [авазендивок, авазтивок]
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: аванендивок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонвок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонвок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авашканвок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авашканвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: ававанвок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: ававанвок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авацевок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: аватневок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: аваценьвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: аватненьвок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авадотвок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авадотвок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомотвок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомотвок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкатвок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкатвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авасотвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авасотвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авастотвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авастотвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авазтвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: авазтвок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: ававатвок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2+Clt/вок+Clt: ававатвок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авацвок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: аванзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: аванцвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: аванзонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: аванцтывок
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: аванзондывок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авашканзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авашканзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: ававанзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: ававанзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: аванькевок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: аванькевок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: аванькеньвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: аванькеньвок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: аванькендивок
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: аванькендивок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонквок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонквок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонквок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонквок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: авашканквок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: авашканквок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонквок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонквок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонквок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонквок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонквок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонквок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: ававанквок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1+Clt/вок+Clt: ававанквок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авантевок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авантевок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авантеньвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авантеньвок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авантендивок
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авантендивок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонтвок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонтвок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонтвок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонтвок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкантвок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкантвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонтвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонтвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонтвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонтвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонтвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонтвок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: ававантвок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2+Clt/вок+Clt: ававантвок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: аваснавок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: аваснавок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: аваснонвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: аваснонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: аваснондывок
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: аваснондывок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: авадоствок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: авадоствок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомоствок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомоствок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкаствок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкаствок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: авасоствок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: авасоствок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: авастоствок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: авастоствок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: авазоствок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: авазоствок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: ававаствок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3+Clt/вок+Clt: ававаствок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аватвок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/вок+Clt: аваневок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/вок+Clt: аванзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/вок+Clt: авасьвок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/вок+Clt: аватьвок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/вок+Clt: авативок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/вок+Clt: аватневок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/вок+Clt: аватненьвок
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/вок+Clt: аватнендивок
